Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-604
Veterans; mentally ill; order of commitment by court of another state; effect.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court or board of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia committing a person to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States Government for care or treatment shall have the same force and effect, as to the committed person while in this state, as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court or board entering the judgment or making the order. The courts or boards of the committing state or of the District of Columbia shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person so committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of such person and determining the necessity for continuance of restraint. Consent is hereby given to the application of the law of the committing state or district in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any hospital or facility of the department or of any institution operated in this state by any other agency of the United States to retain custody of, transfer, parole, or discharge the committed person.

Laws 1947, c. 307, § 4, p. 937;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 27.